Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1578
Discovery of property of debtor; orders to judgment debtors and witnesses; service; filing; record.

The orders to judgment debtors and witnesses provided for in sections 25-1564 to 25-1580 shall be signed and filed by the judge making the same and shall be served in the same manner as a summons in other cases. The judge shall sign all such orders. Such orders shall be filed with the clerk of the court of the county in which the judgment is rendered or the transcript of the judgment filed, and the clerk shall enter on the record the date and time of filing the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 547, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8126;

C.S.1922, § 9062;

C.S.1929, § 20-1580;

R.S.1943, § 25-1578;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 28.